nl: Glassteen toepassingsmethode: Om te lijmen; Hotfix (warmtebevestiging); Mozaïek/inleg; Voor plaatsing in zetting; Om op te naaien; Overig
fr: Méthode d’application des pierres de verre: À coller; Thermocollant (fixé à la chaleur); Mosaïque/Incrustation; Serti en bijouterie; À coudre; Autre
pl: Metoda tworzenia szklanych kamieni: Przyklejane; Hotfix (termo-przylepne); Mozaika / inkrustacja; W oprawie jubilerskiej; Przyszywane; Inne
bg-BG: Метод за поставяне на стъклени камъчета: За залепване; За топло залепване (hotfix); Мозайка/инлеи; Поставяне в бижутерски обков; За пришиване; Друго
zh-CN: 玻璃石应用方式: 胶粘; 烫钻（热定型）; 马赛克/镶嵌; 镶嵌于珠宝底座; 缝缀; 其他
cs: Způsob aplikace skleněných oblázků: Nalepovací; Nažehlovací (hotfix); Mozaika/intarzie; Osazeno do šperku; Našívací; Ostatní
ro-RO: Metoda de aplicare a pietrei de sticlă: Prin lipire; Termolipire (Hotfix); Mozaic/Încrustare; În montură de bijuterii; De cusut; Altele
vi: Phương pháp gắn đá thủy tinh: Dán keo; Đính nóng (cố định bằng nhiệt); Khảm/Cẩn; Đính trên trang sức; Khâu đính; Khác
sk-SK: Spôsob nanášania sklenených kamienkov: Na nalepenie; Hotfix (nažehľovacie); Mozaika/intarzia; Zasadené v šperku; Na prišitie; Iné
sl-SI: Metoda aplikacije steklenega kamna: Lepljenje; Toplotno pritrjevanje (hotfix); Mozaik/vložek; Vdelava v nakit; Šivanje; Drugo
el: Μέθοδος τοποθέτησης γυάλινων διακοσμητικών λίθων: Με κόλλα; Hotfix (θερμική εφαρμογή); Μωσαϊκό/Ένθετο; Τοποθέτηση σε βάση κοσμήματος; Ραφτό; Άλλο
pt-PT: Método da aplicação de pedra de vidro: Para colar; Hotfix (fixação por calor); Mosaico/embutido; Engastado numa joia; Para coser; Outro
sv: Appliceringsmetod för glassten: Limas på; Hotfix (värmefixering); Mosaik/inläggning; Infattad i smycke; Sys på; Övrigt
da: Metode til påføring af glassten: Limes på; Hotfix (varmefiksering); Mosaik/indlæg; Sættes i smykkeindfatning; Sys på; Andet
lt-LT: Stiklinių akmenėlių naudojimo metodas: Klijuojamas; Tvirtinamas karščiu („Hotfix“); Mozaika / inkrustacija; Įsodintas į papuošalo rėmelį; Prisiuvamas; Kita
nb: Glassstein-appmetode: Til å lime på; Hotfix (varmeherdet); Mosaikk/innlegg; Satt i smykkeinnfatning; Sy på; Annet
fi: Lasikiven käyttötapa: Liimattava; Hotfix (kuumakiinnitteinen); Mosaiikki/upotus; Istutettu korun kantaan; Ommeltava; Muu
es: Método de aplicación de piedras de vidrio: Pegado; Termofijado (fijación por calor); Mosaico/Incrustación; Engastado en joya; Cosido; Otro
zh-TW: 玻璃石施用方式: 黏貼式; 燙鑽 (熱定型); 馬賽克/鑲嵌; 珠寶鑲嵌; 縫紉式; 其他
th: วิธีการติดพลอยกระจก: ติดกาว; ติดด้วยความร้อน; โมเสก/ฝัง; ฝังในตัวเรือนเครื่องประดับ; เย็บติด; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Metoda primjene staklenog kamena: Lijepljenje; Hotfix (toplinsko fiksiranje); Mozaik/umetanje; Ugradnja u okvir za nakit; Prišivanje; Ostalo
ja: ガラスストーンの適用方法: 接着式; ホットフィックス (熱圧着); モザイク/インレイ; ジュエリーセッティング; 縫い付け式; その他
tr: Cam taş uygulama yöntemi: Yapıştırmalı; Sıcak baskı (ısıyla sabitlenen); Mozaik/Kakma; Takı yuvasına yerleştirme; Dikmeli; Diğer
pt-BR: Método de aplicação da pedra de vidro: Colagem; Hotfix (fixação térmica); Mosaico/Incrustação; Cravado em configuração de joalheria; Costura; Outro
de: Anwendungsmethode für Glassteine: Zum Aufkleben; Hotfix (Heißfixierung); Mosaik/Inlay; Einfassung in Schmuckfassung; Zum Aufnähen; Sonstige
it: Metodo dell'app per pietra di vetro: Da incollare; Termoadesivo (hotfix); Mosaico/intarsio; Incastonatura per gioielli; Da cucire; Altro
ko: 글라스 스톤 부착 방식: 접착식; 핫픽스(열접착); 모자이크/인레이; 주얼리 세팅 삽입; 봉제식; 기타
hu: Üvegkő alkalmazási módszer: Felragasztható; Vasalható (Hotfix); Mozaik/berakás; Ékszerfoglalatba helyezhető; Felvarrható; Egyéb
ru: Способ нанесения стеклянных камней: Клеевые; Термоклеевые (hotfix); Мозаика/инкрустация; Закрепка в ювелирную оправу; Пришивные; Другое
en: Glass stone application method: Glue-on; Hotfix (heat-set); Mosaic/Inlay; Set in jewelry setting; Sew-on; Other